Colorado, session 2026A, SB018.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-15-101, add (7) as
follows:
13-15-101. Petition - proceedings - applicability - definition.
(7) (a) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (7), "SUPPRESSED COURT
RECORD" MEANS A COURT RECORD THAT IS ONLY ACCESSIBLE TO JUDGES;
COURT STAFF; A PARTY TO THE CASE, INCLUDING A PARTY'S ATTORNEY;
AUTHORIZED JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT STAFF; AND AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

VALID COURT ORDER OR AFFIDAVIT AUTHORIZING ACCESS TO THE COURT
RECORD.
(b) (I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, IF A PETITIONER IS UNDER EIGHTEEN
YEARS OLD AT THE TIME OF FILING THE PETITION, A COURT RECORD
ASSOCIATED WITH A PETITION SEEKING TO CHANGE THE PETITIONER'S NAME
IS A SUPPRESSED COURT RECORD. NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 13-15-102,
THE SUPPRESSED COURT RECORD MAY BE USED BY THE COURT FOR
ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES, BUT THE COURT SHALL NOT UNDER ANY
CIRCUMSTANCE PUBLISH THE PETITIONER'S NAME OR THE PETITIONER'S NEW
NAME ONLINE.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (7)(b) DOES NOT APPLY IF THE NAME CHANGE
IS GRANTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION AND THE GOOD
CAUSE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES.
(III) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (7)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IF
A PERSON PETITIONS THE COURT TO SUPPRESS A COURT RECORD ASSOCIATED
WITH A PETITION TO CHANGE THE PETITIONER'S NAME THAT IS FILED BEFORE
JULY 1, 2026, THE COURT SHALL GRANT THE REQUEST AND ORDER THE
RECORDS SUPPRESSED.
(c) A COURT SHALL GRANT AN INDIVIDUAL ACCESS TO A SUPPRESSED
COURT RECORD IF THE INDIVIDUAL OBTAINS VERBAL CONSENT FROM A
PARTY TO THE CASE AND SUBMITS AN AFFIDAVIT TO THE COURT, UNDER
PENALTY OF PERJURY, THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS OBTAINED THE VERBAL
CONSENT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-15-102, add (3.5)
as follows:
13-15-102. Publication of change.
(3.5) A PETITIONER IS NOT REQUIRED TO GIVE PUBLIC NOTICE OF A
NAME CHANGE AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION IF THE
PETITION IS BEING FILED BY, OR ON BEHALF OF, A PERSON WHO IS UNDER
EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-018

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-018